it: Varietà di spinaci: Spinacino; Spinaci rampicanti; Spinaci inglesi; Spinaci a foglia liscia; Spinaci del Malabar; Spinaci della Nuova Zelanda; Spinaci rossi; Spinaci ricci; Spinaci semi-ricci; Spinaci d'acqua; Altro
ru: Разновидность шпината: Бэби-шпинат; Вьющийся шпинат; Английский шпинат; Плосколистный шпинат; Малабарский шпинат; Новозеландский шпинат; Красный шпинат; Савойский шпинат; Полусавойский шпинат; Водяной шпинат; Другое
hu: Spenótfajta: Bébispenót; Kúszó spenót; Angol spenót; Sima levelű spenót; Malabári spenót; Új-zélandi spenót; Piros spenót; Fodros spenót; Félig fodros spenót; Vízispenót; Egyéb
el: Ποικιλία σπανακιού: Baby σπανάκι; Αναρριχώμενο σπανάκι; Αγγλικό σπανάκι; Σπανάκι με πλατιά φύλλα; Σπανάκι Μαλαμπάρ; Σπανάκι Νέας Ζηλανδίας; Κόκκινο σπανάκι; Σπανάκι Σαβοΐας; Σπανάκι ημι-σαβοΐας; Σπανάκι νερού; Άλλο
zh-TW: 菠菜品種: 嫩菠菜; 攀緣菠菜; 英國菠菜; 平葉菠菜; 落葵 (皇宮菜); 紐西蘭菠菜; 紅菠菜; 皺葉菠菜; 半皺葉菠菜; 空心菜; 其他
ja: ほうれん草の種類: ベビースピナッチ; ツルムラサキ; イングリッシュスピナッチ; フラットリーフスピナッチ; ツルムラサキ; ツルナ; レッドスピナッチ; ちぢみほうれん草; セミサボイスピナッチ; 空芯菜; その他
lt-LT: Špinatų veislė: Mažieji špinatai; Vijokliniai špinatai; Angliški špinatai; Lygialapiai špinatai; Malabaro špinatai; Naujosios Zelandijos špinatai; Raudonieji špinatai; Garbanotieji špinatai; Pusiau garbanotieji špinatai; Vandens špinatai; Kita
pt-PT: Variedade de espinafre: Espinafre baby; Espinafre trepador; Espinafre inglês; Espinafre de folha lisa; Espinafre de Malabar; Espinafre da Nova Zelândia; Espinafre vermelho; Espinafre savoy; Espinafre semi-savoy; Espinafre de água; Outro
ko: 시금치 품종: 어린 시금치; 덩굴 시금치; 잉글리시 시금치; 평엽 시금치; 말라바 시금치; 뉴질랜드 시금치; 붉은 시금치; 사보이 시금치; 세미 사보이 시금치; 공심채; 기타
da: Spinatvariant: Babyspinat; Klatrespinat; Engelsk spinat; Glatbladet spinat; Malabarspinat; Newzealandsk spinat; Rød spinat; Savoyspinat; Semi-savoyspinat; Vandspinat; Andet
sk-SK: Odroda špenátu: Baby špenát; Popínavý špenát; Anglický špenát; Hladkolistý špenát; Malabarský špenát; Novozélandský špenát; Červený špenát; Kučeravý špenát (Savoy); Polokučeravý špenát; Vodný špenát; Iný
pl: Odmiana szpinaku: Młody szpinak; Szpinak pnący; Szpinak angielski; Szpinak o gładkich liściach; Szpinak malabarski; Szpinak nowozelandzki; Czerwony szpinak; Szpinak savoy; Szpinak semi-savoy; Szpinak wodny; Inne
fi: Pinaattilajike: Babypinaatti; Köynnöspinaatti; Englantilainen pinaatti; Sileälehtinen pinaatti; Malabarinpinaatti; Uudenseelanninpinaatti; Punainen pinaatti; Kurttupinaatti; Puolikurttupinaatti; Vesipinaatti; Muu
ro-RO: Soi de spanac: Baby spanac; Spanac urcător; Spanac englezesc; Spanac cu frunză plată; Spanac Malabar; Spanac de Noua Zeelandă; Spanac roșu; Spanac Savoy; Spanac Semi-savoy; Spanac de apă; Altele
pt-BR: Espinafre variedade: Espinafre baby; Espinafre-trepadeira; Espinafre inglês; Espinafre de folha lisa; Espinafre-de-malabar; Espinafre-da-nova-zelândia; Espinafre vermelho; Espinafre savoy; Espinafre semi-savoy; Espinafre aquático; Outros
nb: Spinatvariant: Babyspinat; Klatrespinat; Engelsk spinat; Glattbladet spinat; Malabarspinat; Newzealandsk spinat; Rød spinat; Savøyspinat; Halv-savøyspinat; Vannspinat; Annet
sl-SI: Sorta špinače: Mladi špinačni listi; Plezava špinača (Malabar); Angleška špinača; Gladkolistna špinača; Malabarska špinača; Novozelandska špinača; Rdeča špinača; Kodrolistna špinača; Polkodrolistna špinača; Vodna špinača; Drugo
fr: Variété d’épinards: Jeunes pousses d’épinard; Épinard grimpant; Épinard anglais; Épinard à feuilles plates; Épinard de Malabar; Épinard de Nouvelle-Zélande; Épinard rouge; Épinard de Savoie; Épinard semi-Savoie; Épinard d’eau; Autre
sv: Spenatsort: Babyspenat; Klätterspenat; Engelsk spenat; Slätbladig spenat; Malabarspenat; Nyzeeländsk spenat; Röd spenat; Savoyspenat; Halv-savoyspenat; Vattenspenat; Annat
th: ผักโขมหลากหลายชนิด: เบบี้สปิแนช; สปิแนชเลื้อย; อิงลิชสปิแนช; สปิแนชใบเรียบ; มาลาบาร์สปิแนช; นิวซีแลนด์สปิแนช; สปิแนชแดง; ซาวอยสปิแนช; เซมิซาวอยสปิแนช; ผักบุ้ง; อื่นๆ
cs: Odrůda špenátu: Baby špenát; Popínavý špenát; Anglický špenát; Hladkolistý špenát; Malabarský špenát; Novozélandský špenát; Červený špenát; Kadeřavý špenát; Polokadeřavý špenát; Vodní špenát; Jiné
zh-CN: 菠菜品种: 嫩叶菠菜; 攀缘菠菜; 英国菠菜; 平叶菠菜; 木耳菜; 新西兰菠菜; 红叶菠菜; 皱叶菠菜; 半皱叶菠菜; 空心菜; 其他
de: Spinatart: Babyspinat; Kletterspinat; Echter Spinat; Glattblattspinat; Malabarspinat; Neuseeländischer Spinat; Roter Spinat; Krauser Spinat; Halbkrauser Spinat; Wasserspinat; Sonstige
bg-BG: Сорт спанак: Бейби спанак; Увивен спанак; Английски спанак; Гладколистен спанак; Малабарски спанак; Новозеландски спанак; Червен спанак; Къдрав спанак; Полукъдрав спанак; Воден спанак; Друг
tr: Ispanak çeşidi: Bebek ıspanak; Tırmanıcı ıspanak; İngiliz ıspanağı; Düz yapraklı ıspanak; Malabar ıspanağı; Yeni Zelanda ıspanağı; Kırmızı ıspanak; Savoy ıspanağı; Yarı savoy ıspanağı; Su ıspanağı; Diğer
es: Variedad de espinacas: Espinaca baby; Espinaca trepadora; Espinaca inglesa; Espinaca de hoja lisa; Espinaca malabar; Espinaca de Nueva Zelanda; Espinaca roja; Espinaca savoy; Espinaca semi-savoy; Espinaca de agua; Otro
hr-HR: Sorta špinata: Mladi špinat (baby); Špinat penjač; Engleski špinat; Špinat glatkog lista; Malabarski špinat; Novozelandski špinat; Crveni špinat; Kovrčavi špinat (Savoy); Polukovrčavi špinat (Semi-savoy); Vodeni špinat; Ostalo
nl: Spinazie variëteit: Babyspinazie; Klimspinazie; Engelse spinazie; Gladbladige spinazie; Malabarspinazie; Nieuw-Zeelandse spinazie; Rode spinazie; Savooiespinazie; Half-savooiespinazie; Waterspinazie; Overige
vi: Giống rau bina: Rau bina non; Mồng tơi; Rau bina Anh; Rau bina lá phẳng; Mồng tơi; Rau bina New Zealand; Dền đỏ; Rau bina Savoy; Rau bina Semi-savoy; Rau muống; Khác
en: Spinach variety: Baby spinach; Climbing spinach; English spinach; Flat-leaf spinach; Malabar spinach; New Zealand spinach; Red spinach; Savoy spinach; Semi-savoy spinach; Water spinach; Other